ja: 麦芽の色評価システム: EBC; ロビボンド (°L); SRM; その他
en: Malt color rating system: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Other
fr: Système d’évaluation de la couleur du malt: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Autre
nl: Mout kleurbeoordelingssysteem: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Anders
sk-SK: Systém hodnotenia farby sladu: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Iný
pt-BR: Malte sistema de classificação de cor: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Outro
nb: Fargegraderingssystem for malt: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Annet
it: Sistema di classificazione del colore del malto: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Altro
zh-TW: 麥芽顏色評等系統: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de classificação da cor do malte: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Outro
hr-HR: Sustav ocjenjivanja boja slada: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Ostalo
el: Σύστημα αξιολόγησης χρώματος βύνης: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Άλλο
ro-RO: Sistem de clasificare a culorii malțului: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Altele
fi: Maltaan väriluokitusjärjestelmä: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Muu
cs: Systém hodnocení sladových barev: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Jiné
bg-BG: Система за оценка на цветовете на малца: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Други
zh-CN: 麦芽色度分级系统: EBC; 罗维朋 (°L); SRM; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem ocenjevanja barve slada: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Drugo
da: Rangeringssystem til maltfarve: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Andet
th: ระบบการให้คะแนนสีของมอลต์: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; อื่นๆ
tr: Malt renk derecelendirme sistemi: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Diğer
pl: System oceny koloru słodu: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Inne
vi: Hệ thống đánh giá màu sắc mạch nha: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Khác
sv: Färgklassificeringssystem för malt: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Annat
lt-LT: Salyklo spalvos vertinimo sistema: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Kita
es: Sistema de clasificación del color de la malta: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Otro
ru: Система оценки цвета солода: EBC; Ловибонд (°L); SRM; Другое
hu: Maláta színértékelési rendszere: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Egyéb
ko: 맥아 색도 등급 시스템: EBC; 로비본드(°L); SRM; 기타
de: Bewertungssystem für Malzfarbe: EBC; Lovibond (°L); SRM; Sonstige